New York, session 2025-2026, S7623.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, 2 any person who is licensed or certified as a physician, physician's 3 assistant, massage therapist, physical therapist, chiropractor, dentist, 4 optometrist, nurse, nurse practitioner, emergency medical technician, 5 podiatrist or athletic trainer by a foreign government may provide 6 professional services within this state without first being licensed 7 pursuant to the provisions of title 8 of the education law or certified 8 pursuant to the provisions in the public health law, as may be applica- 9 ble, to the team athletes, coaches, staff and delegations originating 10 from such foreign government, in connection with the FIFA Club World Cup 11 2025 and the FIFA World Cup 26. Such services shall be limited to 12 athletes and personnel in relation to the FIFA Club World Cup 2025, 13 between the dates of June 1, 2025, and July 31, 2025, and the FIFA World 14 Cup 26, between the dates of June 1, 2026, and July 31, 2026. 15 § 2. Any person who is licensed or certified to practice as a physi- 16 cian, physician's assistant, massage therapist, physical therapist, 17 chiropractor, dentist, optometrist, nurse, nurse practitioner, emergency 18 medical technician, podiatrist or athletic trainer in another state or 19 territory, who is in good standing in such state or territory, and who 20 has been appointed by the Federation Internationale de Football Associ- 21 ation (FIFA) to provide professional services at an event in this state 22 sanctioned by the Federation Internationale de Football Association EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD11769-01-5 S. 7623 2 1 (FIFA), may provide such professional services to team athletes, coach- 2 es, staff and delegations from such state or territory registered to 3 train at a location in this state or registered to compete in an event 4 conducted under the sanction of the Federation Internationale de Foot- 5 ball Association (FIFA) in this state without first being licensed 6 pursuant to the provisions of title 8 of the education law or certified 7 pursuant to the provisions of the public health law, as may be applica- 8 ble. Such services shall be limited to team athletes, coaches, staff and 9 delegations in relation to the FIFA Club World Cup 2025, between the 10 dates of June 1, 2025, and July 31, 2025, and the FIFA World Cup 26, 11 between the dates of June 1, 2026, and July 31, 2026. 12 § 3. This act shall take effect June 1, 2025, and shall expire and be 13 deemed repealed July 31, 2026.